test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-sijdd_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - sijdd: # Noun 'village' - full paradigm
     sijdd+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: sijdd
     sijdd+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: siid
     sijdd+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: siid
     sijdd+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: siʹjdde
     sijdd+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: siidâst
     sijdd+N+Sg+Com+Indef: siidin
     sijdd+N+Ess+Indef: sijddân
     sijdd+N+Par+Indef: sijddâd
     sijdd+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [siidtaa, siidtää]
     sijdd+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: siid
     sijdd+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: siidi
     sijdd+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: siidid
     sijdd+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: siidid
     sijdd+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: siidin
     sijdd+N+Pl+Com+Indef: siidivuiʹm
     sijdd+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [siiditaa, siiditää]
